Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Enforcement of Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Standards.

§ 77-11-1.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this article is to make provision for the enforcement by the Mississippi Public Service Commission of Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Standards adopted both by the Mississippi Public Service Commission and by the U. S. Department of Transportation, pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 3 of this title, and the Federal Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 USC, sections 1671 et seq., by way of injunctive and monetary sanctions substantially the same as are provided under Section 1678 and Section 1679 of said federal act, so that the commission may certify as the regulatory authority as provided in said federal act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-01; Laws, 1971, ch. 331, § 1, eff sixty (60) days from and after passage (approved March 6, 1971).

§ 77-11-3.
Civil penalties.

Any person operating a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Public Service Commission under subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3, and Section 77-3-5, who violates any provision of any Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Standard adopted both by the United States Department of Transportation, pursuant to the provisions of the Federal Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, and by the commission pursuant to Article 1, Chapter 3, of this title, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), payable to the State of Mississippi for each such violation for each day that such violation persists. The maximum civil penalty shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) for any related series of violations.

Any such civil penalty may be imposed by the chancery court of the county in which the violation occurs or in which the person violating the same resides or has his or its principal place of business, upon complaint of the commission and after opportunity for a hearing thereon. Any such civil penalty may be compromised by the commission, subject to the approval of the court. In determining the amount of such penalty, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the appropriateness of such penalty to the size of the business of the person charged, the gravity of the violation and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance, after notification of a violation, shall be considered. The amount of such penalty, when finally determined, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, may be deducted from any sums owing by the State of Mississippi to the person charged or may be recovered under judgment of said chancery court, and upon collection shall be paid to the treasury of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-02; Laws, 1971, ch. 331, § 2, eff sixty (60) days from and after passage (approved March 6, 1971).

§ 77-11-5.
Restraint of violations and enforcement of standards.

Pursuant to the provisions of Section 77-3-75, the chancery court, First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, shall have jurisdiction to restrain violations of the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Standards adopted by both the United States Department of Transportation and the Mississippi Public Service Commission, and to enforce, by mandamus, injunction or other appropriate remedy, orders of said commission adopting such standards. Whenever practicable, the commission shall give notice to any person against whom an action for injunctive relief is contemplated and afford him an opportunity to present his views, and, except in the case of a knowing and willful violation, shall afford him reasonable opportunity to achieve compliance. However, the failure to give such notice and afford such opportunity shall not preclude the granting of appropriate relief.

In any proceeding for criminal contempt for violation of an injunction or restraining order issued under this article, trial shall be by the court, or upon demand of the accused, by a jury and, upon demand of the accused, a jury trial for criminal contempt shall be transferred to the chancery court of the county in which the accused resides or has his principal place of business.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-03; Laws, 1971, ch. 331, § 3, eff sixty (60) days from and after passage (approved March 6, 1971).

§ 77-11-7.
Application of penalties.

The penalties for injunction and monetary sanctions provided in this article apply only to the provisions of this article, and are separate and apart from those otherwise provided by Article 1, Chapter 3, of this title.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7897-04; Laws, 1971, ch. 331, § 4, eff sixty (60) days from and after passage (approved March 6, 1971).